lexc/noun/enhufi.lexc
!!!enhuoa., enhufi lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Noun[gcat]

+Dis +Ess +Soc +Tem 
+Posss1s +Posss2s +Posss3s +Possp1s +Possp2s +Possp3s 
+Posss1p +Posss2p +Posss3p +Possp1p +Possp2p +Possp3p

+Plur +Fam +Gens +Genpl
      
+Abl +Acc[lfea] +Ade +All +Cau +Dat +Del
+Ela +Fac +For +Forp +Forpen +Ill +Ine +Ins +Nom
+Sub +Sup +Ter
      
§k§
§VV§ §uue2§ §AE21§
§UUE2§ §OEOE25§ §UUE21§ §OEOE22§ §oooe2§ §oeoez22§
§AAA2§ §oeoe2§ §AA2§ §oeoez25§ §J1§ §JP1§ §AE221§ §ooez18§ §OEOE17§
§oeoez17§ §EOA17§
§t§ §oooe§ §oeoez2§ §n§ §AAA§ §h§ §oeoe§ §AA§  
§r§ §b§ §uue§ §oeoez§ 

LEXICON Root
Noun;

!define Cons [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m | n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | y | z];
!define Vowel [a | á | e | é | i | í | o | ó | u | ú | ü | ű | ö | ő];
!define Root [ [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3}] | [Cons^{0,4} Vowel^{1,3} Cons^{1,4} Vowel^{0,3} ]* ] ;


LEXICON AddNoun1
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur1;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam1;

LEXICON Poss1
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^am   Fam1;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^ad   Fam1;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^a   Fam1;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^unk   Fam1;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^atok   Fam1;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^uk   Fam1;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^aitok   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam1;

LEXICON Plur1
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen1;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§ak    Gen1;
                            Gen1;
        
LEXICON Fam1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen1;
                       Gen1;

LEXICON Gen1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case1;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case1;
                       Case1;
 
LEXICON Case1
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or #; ! kor


LEXICON AddNoun
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Poss;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plur;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Fam;

LEXICON Poss
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Fam;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Fam;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J1§§AE21§   Fam;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fam;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Fam;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J1§§UUE21§k   Fam;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP1§§AE221§im   Fam;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP1§§AE221§id   Fam;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP1§§AE221§i   Fam;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP1§§AE221§ink   Fam;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP1§§AE221§it§OEOE22§k   Fam;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP1§§AE221§ik   Fam;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Fam1;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Fam1;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Fam1;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Fam1;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^aitok   Fam1;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Fam1;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fam;

LEXICON Plur
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Gen;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§ak    Gen;
                            Gen;
        
LEXICON Fam
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Gen;
                       Gen;

LEXICON Gen
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Case;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Case;
                       Case;
 
LEXICON Case
+Abl:^+cAbl^t§oooe2§l     #;  ! tól, től
+Acc[lfea]:^+cAcc^§oeoez22§t    #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^n§AAA2§l      #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^h§oeoe2§z     #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért           #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^n§AA2§k       #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^r§oooe2§l     #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue2§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^b§oooe2§l     #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA2§    #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^ként          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^b§AA2§        #;  ! ba, be
+Ine:^+cIne^b§AA2§n       #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA2§l    #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0             #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^r§AA2§        #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez25§n    #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig            #;  ! ig

LEXICON AddNounferfi
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Possferfi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Plurferfi;
[stem]+Noun[gcat]:0     Famferfi;

LEXICON Possferfi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez18§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA17§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE17§m   Famferfi;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE17§d   Famferfi;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J1§§AE21§   Famferfi;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Famferfi;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE17§t§OEOE25§k   Famferfi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J1§§UUE21§k   Famferfi;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP1§§AE221§im   Famferfi;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP1§§AE221§id   Famferfi;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP1§§AE221§i   Famferfi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP1§§AE221§ink   Famferfi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP1§§AE221§it§OEOE22§k   Famferfi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP1§§AE221§ik   Famferfi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^aim   Famferfi;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^aid   Famferfi;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^ai   Famferfi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^aink   Famferfi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^aitok   Famferfi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^aik   Famferfi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famferfi1;

LEXICON Plurferfi
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genferfi;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§ak    Genferfi;
                            Genferfi1;
        
LEXICON Famferfi
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genferfi;
                       Genferfi;
        
LEXICON Famferfi1
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Genferfi;
                       Genferfi1;

LEXICON Genferfi
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseferfi;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseferfi;
                       Caseferfi;
LEXICON Genferfi1
+Gens:^+cGens^é        Caseferfi;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Caseferfi;
                       Caseferfi1;
 

LEXICON Noun
Andrásfi AddNoun;
Andrásfy AddNoun;
Balásfi AddNoun;
Balásfy AddNoun;
Bertalanffi AddNoun;
Bertalanffy AddNoun;
Bogdánfi AddNoun;
Bogdánfy AddNoun;
Bánfi AddNoun;
Bánfy AddNoun;
Bátorfi AddNoun;
Bátorfy AddNoun;
Békeffi AddNoun;
Békeffy AddNoun;
Békefi AddNoun;
Békefy AddNoun;
Böngérfi AddNoun;
Böngérfy AddNoun;
Dezsőffi AddNoun;
Dezsőffy AddNoun;
Gilétfi AddNoun;
Gilétfy AddNoun;
Győrfi AddNoun;
Győrfy AddNoun;
Gálfi AddNoun;
Gálfy AddNoun;
Himfi AddNoun;
Himfy AddNoun;
Inczefi AddNoun;
Inczefy AddNoun;
Istvánffi AddNoun;
Istvánffy AddNoun;
Istvánfi AddNoun;
Istvánfy AddNoun;
Ivánfi AddNoun;
Ivánfy AddNoun;
Kelmenfi AddNoun;
Kelmenfy AddNoun;
Lackfi AddNoun;
Lackfy AddNoun;
Loránfi AddNoun;
Loránfy AddNoun;
Mezőfi AddNoun;
Mezőfy AddNoun;
Mihályfi AddNoun; 
Mihályfy AddNoun; 
Mártonffi AddNoun;
Mártonffy AddNoun;
Mártonfi AddNoun;
Mártonfy AddNoun;
Ostfi AddNoun;
Ostfy AddNoun;
Pálffi AddNoun;
Pálffy AddNoun;
Pálfi AddNoun;
Pálfy AddNoun;
Péterfi AddNoun;
Péterfy AddNoun;
Rufi AddNoun;
Rufy AddNoun;
Rózsafi AddNoun;
Rózsafy AddNoun;
Szegfi AddNoun;
Szegfy AddNoun;
Sándorffi AddNoun;
Sándorffy AddNoun;
Sándorfi AddNoun;
Sándorfy AddNoun;
Térfi AddNoun;
Térfy AddNoun;
Zerffi AddNoun;
Zerffy AddNoun;
apaférfi AddNounferfi;
atyafi AddNoun;
baromfi AddNoun;
bodzabélúrfi AddNoun;
bronzférfi AddNounferfi;
bábállamférfi AddNounferfi;
bégfi AddNoun;
békakirályfi AddNoun;
csúcsférfi AddNounferfi;
divatfi AddNoun;
egyházfi AddNoun;
egyházférfi AddNounferfi;
emberférfi AddNounferfi;
faférfi AddNounferfi;
fajbaromfi AddNoun;
fi AddNoun1;
frontférfi AddNounferfi;
félbaromfi AddNoun;
férfi AddNounferfi;
galambfi AddNoun;
grillbaromfi AddNoun;
gumiférfi AddNounferfi;
gyámfi AddNoun1;
gólyafi AddNoun;
habférfi AddNounferfi;
hadfi AddNoun;
harcfi AddNoun;
harmatkirályfi AddNoun;
haszonbaromfi AddNoun;
hazafi AddNoun;
hibridbaromfi AddNoun;
honfi AddNoun;
húsbaromfi AddNoun;
hősfi AddNoun;
istenférfi AddNounferfi;
izomférfi AddNounferfi;
jobbágyférfi AddNounferfi;
kirakatférfi AddNounferfi;
királyfi AddNoun;
kormányférfi AddNounferfi;
kultuszférfi AddNounferfi;
kurafi AddNoun;
latorfi AddNoun;
lárvaúrfi AddNoun;
macskaúrfi AddNoun;
madárfi AddNoun;
majomférfi AddNounferfi;
majomkirályfi AddNoun;
malacfi AddNoun;
maradékférfi AddNounferfi;
mintaférfi AddNounferfi;
mosóférfi AddNounferfi;
munkásférfi AddNounferfi;
mézeskalácsférfi AddNounferfi;
múzsafi AddNoun;
műférfi AddNounferfi;
művészférfi AddNounferfi;
naposbaromfi AddNoun;
nemhazafi AddNoun;
nyúlfi AddNoun;
népfi AddNoun;
parasztférfi AddNounferfi;
pillangóúrfi AddNoun;
pártférfi AddNounferfi;
pásztorférfi AddNounferfi;
rovarúrfi AddNoun;
rókafi AddNoun;
segédegyházfi AddNoun;
sportférfi AddNounferfi;
szerencsefi AddNoun;
szerzetesférfi AddNounferfi;
szájhazafi AddNoun;
süldőatyafi AddNoun;
tanítóférfi AddNounferfi;
tenyészbaromfi AddNoun;
testvératyafi AddNoun;
tojóbaromfi AddNoun;
tulipánkirályfi AddNoun;
tündérkirályfi AddNoun;
vajdafi AddNoun;
verébfi AddNoun;
világfi AddNoun;
vágóbaromfi AddNoun;
vízibaromfi AddNoun;
álhazafi AddNoun;
államférfi AddNounferfi;
álomférfi AddNounferfi;
árubaromfi AddNoun;
átlagférfi AddNounferfi;
élőbaromfi AddNoun;
érdekhazafi AddNoun;
ösztönférfi AddNounferfi;
úrfi AddNoun;
